California statutes. Penal Code
(4) This section does not supersede the requirement that a mandated reporter first attempt to make a report via telephone, or that agencies specified in Section 11165.9 accept reports from mandated reporters and other persons as required.

(c) A mandated reporter who fails to report an incident of known or reasonably suspected child abuse or neglect as required by this section is guilty of a misdemeanor punishable by up to six months confinement in a county jail or by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000) or by both that imprisonment and fine. If a mandated reporter intentionally conceals the mandated reporter’s failure to report an incident
 known by the mandated reporter to be abuse or severe neglect under this section, the failure to report is a continuing offense until an agency specified in Section 11165.9 discovers the offense.

(d) (1) A clergy member who acquires knowledge or a reasonable suspicion of child abuse or neglect during a penitential communication is not subject to subdivision (a). For the purposes of this subdivision, “penitential communication” means a communication, intended to be in confidence, including, but not limited to, a sacramental confession, made to a clergy member who, in the course of the discipline or practice of the clergy member’s church, denomination, or organization, is authorized or accustomed to hear those communications, and under the discipline, tenets, customs, or practices of the clergy member’s church, denomination, or organization, has a duty to keep those communications secret.

(2) This subdivision does not modify or limit a clergy member’s duty to report known or suspected child abuse or neglect when the clergy member is acting in some other capacity that would otherwise make the clergy member a mandated reporter.

(3) (A) On or before January 1, 2004, a clergy member or any custodian of records for the clergy member may report to an agency specified in Section 11165.9 that the clergy member or any custodian of records for the clergy member, prior to January 1, 1997, in the clergy member’s professional capacity or within the scope of the clergy member’s employment, other than during a penitential communication, acquired knowledge or had a reasonable suspicion that a child had been the victim of sexual abuse and that the clergy member or any custodian of records for the clergy member did not previously report the abuse to an agency
 specified in Section 11165.9. The provisions of Section 11172 shall apply to all reports made pursuant to this paragraph.

(B) This paragraph shall apply even if the victim of the known or suspected abuse has reached the age of majority by the time the required report is made.

(C) The local law enforcement agency shall have jurisdiction to investigate any report of child abuse made pursuant to this paragraph even if the report is made after the victim has reached the age of majority.

(e) (1) A commercial film, photographic print, or image processor who has knowledge of or observes, within the scope of that person’s professional capacity or employment, any film, photograph, videotape, negative, slide, or any representation of information, data, or an image, including, but not limited to, any film,
 filmstrip, photograph, negative, slide, photocopy, videotape, video laser disc, computer hardware, computer software, computer floppy disk, data storage medium, CD-ROM, computer-generated equipment, or computer-generated image depicting a child under 16 years of age engaged in an act of sexual conduct, shall, immediately or as soon as practicably possible, telephonically report the instance of reasonably suspected abuse to the law enforcement agency located in the county in which the images are seen. Within 36 hours of receiving the information concerning the incident, the reporter shall prepare and send, fax, or electronically transmit a written followup report of the incident with a copy of the image or material attached.

(2) A commercial computer technician who has knowledge of or observes, within the scope of the technician’s professional capacity or employment, any representation of information, data, or an image, including, but not
 limited to, any computer hardware, computer software, computer file, computer floppy disk, data storage medium, CD-ROM, computer-generated equipment, or computer-generated image that is retrievable in perceivable form and that is intentionally saved, transmitted, or organized on an electronic medium, depicting a child under 16 years of age engaged in an act of sexual conduct, shall immediately, or as soon as practicably possible, telephonically report the instance of reasonably suspected abuse to the law enforcement agency located in the county in which the images or materials are seen. As soon as practicably possible after receiving the information concerning the incident, the reporter shall prepare and send, fax, or electronically transmit a written followup report of the incident with a brief description of the images or materials.

(3) For purposes of this article, “commercial computer technician” includes an employee designated by an
 employer to receive reports pursuant to an established reporting process authorized by subparagraph (B) of paragraph (43) of subdivision (a) of Section 11165.7.

(4) As used in this subdivision, “electronic medium” includes, but is not limited to, a recording, CD-ROM, magnetic disk memory, magnetic tape memory, CD, DVD, thumbdrive, or any other computer hardware or media.

(5) As used in this subdivision, “sexual conduct” means any of the following:

(A) Sexual intercourse, including genital-genital, oral-genital, anal-genital, or oral-anal, whether between persons of the same or opposite sex or between humans and animals.

(B) Penetration of the vagina or rectum by any object.

(C) Masturbation for the purpose of sexual stimulation of the viewer.

(D) Sadomasochistic abuse for the purpose of sexual stimulation of the viewer.

(E) Exhibition of the genitals, pubic, or rectal areas of a person for the purpose of sexual stimulation of the viewer.

(f) Any mandated reporter who knows or reasonably suspects that the home or institution in which a child resides is unsuitable for the child because of abuse or neglect of the child shall bring the condition to the attention of the agency to which, and at the same time as, the mandated reporter makes a report of the abuse or neglect pursuant to subdivision (a).

(g) Any other person who has knowledge of or observes a child whom the person knows or reasonably suspects has been a
 victim of child abuse or neglect may report the known or suspected instance of child abuse or neglect to an agency specified in Section 11165.9. For purposes of this section, “any other person” includes a mandated reporter who acts in the person’s private capacity and not in the person’s professional capacity or within the scope of the person’s employment.

(h) When two or more persons, who are required to report, jointly have knowledge of a known or reasonably suspected instance of child abuse or neglect, and when there is agreement among them, the telephone report may be made by a member of the team selected by mutual agreement and a single report may be made and signed by the selected member of the reporting team. Any member who has knowledge that the member designated to report has failed to do so shall thereafter make the report.

(i) (1) The reporting
 duties under this section are individual, and no supervisor or administrator may impede or inhibit the reporting duties, and no person making a report shall be subject to any sanction for making the report. However, internal procedures to facilitate reporting and apprise supervisors and administrators of reports may be established provided that they are not inconsistent with this article. An internal policy shall not direct an employee to allow the employee’s supervisor to file or process a mandated report under any circumstances.

(2) The internal procedures shall not require any employee required to make reports pursuant to this article to disclose the employee’s identity to the employer.

(3) Reporting the information regarding knowledge of or reasonably suspected child abuse or neglect to an employer, supervisor, school principal, school counselor, coworker, or other person
 shall not be a substitute for making a mandated report to an agency specified in Section 11165.9.

(j) (1) A county probation or welfare department shall immediately, or as soon as practicably possible, report by telephone, fax, or electronic transmission to the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the case, to the agency given the responsibility for investigation of cases under Section 300 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, and to the district attorney’s office every known or reasonably suspected instance of child abuse or neglect, as defined in Section 11165.6, except acts or omissions coming within subdivision (b) of Section 11165.2, or reports made pursuant to Section 11165.13 based on risk to a child that relates solely to the inability of the parent to provide the child with regular care due to the parent’s substance abuse, which shall be reported only to the county welfare or probation department. A
 county probation or welfare department also shall send by fax or electronic transmission a written report thereof within 36 hours of receiving the information concerning the incident to any agency to which it makes a telephone report under this subdivision.

(2) A county probation or welfare department shall immediately, and in no case in more than 24 hours, report to the law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over the case after receiving information that a child or youth who is receiving child welfare services has been identified as the victim of commercial sexual exploitation, as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 11165.1.

(3) (A) When a child or youth who is receiving child welfare services and who is reasonably believed to be the victim of,
 or is at risk of being the victim of, commercial sexual exploitation, as defined in Section 11165.1, is missing or has been abducted, the county probation or welfare department shall immediately, or in no case later than 24 hours from receipt of the information, report the incident to the appropriate law enforcement authority for entry into the National Crime Information Center database of the Federal Bureau of Investigation and to the National Center for Missing and Exploited Children (NCMEC).

(B) The report submitted by the county probation or welfare department to law enforcement agencies and NCMEC shall include, where reasonably possible, all of the following:

(i) A photo of the missing or abducted child or youth.

(ii) A description of the child’s or youth’s physical features, such as height, weight, sex, ethnicity, race,
 hair color, and eye color.

(iii) Endangerment information, such as the child’s or youth’s pregnancy status, prescription medications, suicidal tendencies, vulnerability to being sex trafficked, and other health or risk factors, to the extent such information is released in compliance with other applicable laws.

(iv) Information about whether the child or youth is or may be an Indian child, as defined in Section 224.1 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, including the name of the child’s tribe.

(C) For each child or youth described in this paragraph, the county probation or welfare department shall maintain regular communication with law enforcement agencies, including tribal law enforcement agencies in the case of an Indian child, and NCMEC in efforts to provide a safe recovery of the missing or abducted child or youth, including by sharing information pertaining to the child’s or youth’s recovery and circumstances related to the recovery.

(k) A law enforcement agency shall immediately, or as soon as practicably possible, report by telephone, fax, or electronic transmission to the agency given responsibility for investigation of cases under Section 300 of the Welfare and Institutions Code and to the district attorney’s office every known or reasonably suspected instance of child abuse or neglect reported to it, except acts or omissions coming within subdivision (b) of Section 11165.2, which shall
 be reported only to the county welfare or probation department. A law enforcement agency shall report to the county welfare or probation department every known or reasonably suspected instance of child abuse or neglect reported to it that is alleged to have occurred as a result of the action of a person responsible for the child’s welfare, or as the result of the failure of a person responsible for the child’s welfare to adequately protect the minor from abuse when the person responsible for the child’s welfare knew or reasonably should have known that the minor was in danger of abuse. A law enforcement agency also shall send by fax or electronic transmission a written report thereof within 36 hours of receiving the information concerning the incident to any agency to which it makes a telephone report under this subdivision.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 46, Sec. 4.   (AB 161)   Effective July 2, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11166.01.

(a) Except as provided in subdivision (b), any supervisor or administrator who violates paragraph (1) of subdivision (i) of Section 11166 shall be punished by not more than six months in a county jail, by a fine of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 11162 or subdivision (c) of Section 11166, any mandated reporter who willfully fails to report abuse or neglect, or any person who impedes or inhibits
 a report of abuse or neglect, in violation of this article, where that abuse or neglect results in death or great bodily injury, shall be punished by not more than one year in a county jail, by a fine of not more than five thousand dollars ($5,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2006, Ch. 901, Sec. 10.   Effective January 1, 2007.)
-------------------------------------------

11166.02.

(a) A county welfare agency, in accordance with Section 10612.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, may develop a program for internet-based reporting of child abuse and neglect. The program may receive reports by mandated reporters, as
 defined in Section 11165.7, of suspected child abuse or neglect and shall meet all of the following conditions:

(1) The suspected child abuse or neglect does not indicate that the child is subject to an immediate risk of abuse, neglect, or exploitation or that the child is in imminent danger of severe harm or death.

(2) The agency provides an internet form that includes standardized safety assessment qualifying questions in order to obtain necessary information required to assess the need for child welfare services and a response. The State Department of Social Services shall provide guidance through written directives to counties participating in the program to incorporate qualifying questions in the online report that would indicate the need to redirect the
 mandated reporter to perform a telephone report.

(3) The mandated reporter is required to complete all required fields, including identity and contact information of the mandated reporter, in order to submit the report.

(4) The agency provides an internet-based reporting system that has appropriate security protocols to preserve the confidentiality of the reports and any documents or photographs submitted through the system.

(5) This section does not change current statutory or regulatory requirements regarding timely review, assessment, and response to reports of possible abuse or neglect.

(b) (1) In a county where the program is active, a
 mandated reporter may use the internet-based reporting tool in lieu of the required initial telephone report required by subdivision (a) of Section 11166. A mandated reporter submitting an internet-based report in accordance with this subdivision shall, as soon as practically possible, cooperate with the agency on any requests for additional information if needed to investigate the report, subject to applicable confidentiality requirements.

(2) In a county where the program is active, a mandated reporter who submits the initial report through the
 internet-based reporting tool in lieu of the required initial telephone report is not required to submit the written followup report required pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 11166.

(c) A county shall decommission its system for internet-based reporting of child abuse and neglect, as developed pursuant to this section, when the State Department of Social Services notifies counties that internet-based reporting of child abuse and neglect is available and functional within the statewide comprehensive child welfare information system.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 242, Sec. 1.   (AB 1929)   Effective January 1, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

11166.05.

Any mandated reporter who has knowledge of or who reasonably suspects that a child is suffering serious emotional damage or is at a substantial risk of suffering serious emotional damage, evidenced by states of being or behavior, including, but not limited to, severe anxiety, depression, withdrawal, or untoward aggressive behavior toward self or others, may make a report to an agency specified in Section 11165.9.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 842, Sec. 9.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

11166.1.

(a) (1) When an agency receives a report pursuant to Section 11166 that contains either of the following, it shall, within 24 hours, notify the licensing office with jurisdiction over the facility:

(A) A report of abuse alleged to have occurred in facilities licensed to care for children by the State Department of Social Services.

(B) A report of the death of a child who was, at the time of death, living at, enrolled in, or regularly attending a facility licensed to care for children by the State Department of Social Services, unless the circumstances of the child’s
 death are clearly unrelated to the child’s care at the facility.

 (2) The agency shall send the licensing agency a copy of its investigation and any other pertinent materials.

(b) Any employee of an agency specified in Section 11165.9 who has knowledge of, or observes in their professional capacity or within the scope of their employment, a child in protective custody whom the employee knows or reasonably suspects has been the victim of child abuse or neglect shall, within 36 hours, send or have sent to the attorney who represents the child in dependency court, a copy of the report prepared in accordance with Section 11166. The agency shall maintain a copy of the written report. All information requested by the attorney for the child or the child’s guardian ad litem shall
 be provided by the agency within 30 days of the request.

(c) (1) When an agency receives a report pursuant to Section 11166 alleging abuse or neglect of the child of a minor parent or a nonminor dependent parent, the agency shall, within 36 hours, provide notice of the report to the attorney who represents the minor parent or nonminor dependent in dependency court.

(2) For purposes of this subdivision, “minor parent” and “nonminor dependent parent” have the same meaning as in Section 16002.5 of the Welfare and Institutions Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 585, Sec. 1.   (AB 670)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------

11166.2.

In addition to the reports required under Section 11166, any agency specified in Section 11165.9 shall immediately or as soon as practically possible report by telephone, fax, or electronic transmission to the appropriate licensing agency every known or suspected instance of child abuse or neglect when the instance of abuse or neglect occurs while the child is being cared for in a child day care facility, involves a child day care licensed staff person, or occurs while the child is under the supervision of a community care facility or involves a community care
 facility licensee or staff person. The agency shall also send, fax, or electronically transmit a written report thereof within 36 hours of receiving the information concerning the incident to any agency to which it makes a telephone report under this subdivision. The agency shall send the licensing agency a copy of its investigation report and any other pertinent materials.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 133, Sec. 7.   Effective July 31, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11166.3.

(a) The Legislature intends that in each county the law enforcement agencies and the county welfare or probation department shall develop and implement cooperative arrangements in order to coordinate existing duties in connection with the investigation of suspected child abuse or neglect cases. The local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over a case reported under Section 11166 shall report to the county welfare or probation department that it is investigating the case within 36 hours after starting its investigation. The county
 welfare department or probation department shall, in cases where a minor is a victim of actions specified in Section 288 of this code and a petition has been filed pursuant to Section 300 of the Welfare and Institutions Code with regard to the minor, evaluate what action or actions would be in the best interest of the child victim. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, the county welfare department or probation department shall submit in writing its findings and the reasons therefor to the district attorney on or before the completion of the investigation. The written findings and the reasons therefor shall be delivered or made accessible to the defendant or his or her counsel in the manner specified in Section 859.

(b) The local law enforcement agency having jurisdiction over a case reported under Section 11166 shall report to the district office of the State Department of Social Services any case reported under this section if the case
 involves a facility specified in paragraph (5) or (6) of subdivision (a) of Section 1502, Section 1596.750 or 1596.76 of the Health and Safety Code, and the licensing of the facility has not been delegated to a county agency. The law enforcement agency shall send a copy of its investigation report and any other pertinent materials to the licensing agency upon the request of the licensing agency.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 133, Sec. 8.   Effective July 31, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

11166.4.

(a) Each county may use a children’s advocacy center to implement a coordinated multidisciplinary response pursuant to Section 18961.7 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, to investigate reports involving child physical or sexual abuse, exploitation, or maltreatment.

(b) A county that utilizes a child advocacy center to coordinate its multidisciplinary response pursuant to subdivision (a) shall require the children’s advocacy center to meet the following standards:

(1) The multidisciplinary team associated with the children’s advocacy center shall consist of a representative of the children’s advocacy center and at least
 one representative from each of the following disciplines: law enforcement, child protective services, district attorney’s offices, medical providers, mental health providers, victim advocates, and in the case of an Indian child, a representative from the child’s tribe, including, but not limited to, a tribal social worker, tribal social services director, or tribal mental health professional. Members of the multidisciplinary team may fill more than one role, within the scope of their practice, as needed.

(2) The multidisciplinary team associated with the children’s advocacy center shall have cultural competency and diversity training to meet the needs of the community it
 serves.

(3) The children’s advocacy center shall have a designated legal entity responsible for the governance of its operations. This entity shall oversee ongoing business practices of the children’s advocacy center, including setting and implementing administrative policies, hiring and managing personnel, obtaining funding, supervising program and fiscal operations, and conducting long-term planning.

(4) The children’s advocacy center shall provide a dedicated child-focused setting designed to provide a safe, comfortable, and neutral place where forensic interviews and other children’s advocacy center services may be appropriately provided for children and families.

(5) The children’s advocacy center shall use written
 protocols for case review and case review procedures, and shall use a case tracking system to provide information on essential demographics and case information.

(6) The children’s advocacy center shall verify that members of the multidisciplinary team responsible for medical evaluations have specific training in child abuse or child sexual abuse examinations.

(7) The children’s advocacy center shall verify that members of the multidisciplinary team responsible for mental health services are trained in and deliver trauma-focused, evidence-supported mental health treatments.

(8) The children’s advocacy center shall verify that interviews conducted in the course of investigations are conducted in a forensically
 sound manner and occur in a child-focused setting designed to provide a safe, comfortable, and dedicated place for children and families. These interviews are confidential and are not public records.

(9) (A) The children’s advocacy center or other identified multidisciplinary team member custodian shall ensure that all recordings of child forensic interviews be released only in response to a court order. The court shall issue a protective order as part of the release, unless the court finds good cause that disclosure of the interview should not be subject to such an order. The protective order shall include all of the following language:

(i) That the recording be used only for the purposes of
 conducting the party’s side of the case, unless ordered by the court.

(ii) That the recording not be copied, photographed, duplicated, or otherwise reproduced except as a written transcript that does not reveal the identity of the child, unless ordered by the court.

(iii) That the recording not be given, displayed, or in any way provided to a third party, except as permitted in clause (iv) or (v) of this subparagraph or as necessary in preparation for or during trial.

(iv) That the recording remain in the exclusive custody of the attorneys, or in the case of an Indian child, the tribal representative of a tribe unrepresented by an
 attorney, their employees, or agents, including expert witnesses retained by any party, who shall be provided a copy of and instructed to abide by the protective order.

(v) That, except as permitted in clause (iv), if the party is not represented by an attorney, the party, the party’s employees and agents, including expert witnesses, shall
 not be given a copy of the recording but shall be given reasonable access to view or listen to the recording by the custodian of the recording. In a criminal case involving an in pro per defendant, if the court has appointed an investigator, the court may order a copy of the recording be provided to the investigator with a protective order consistent with this section and further order the investigator to return the recording to the court upon conclusion of the criminal case.

(vi) That upon termination of representation or upon disposition of the
 matter, after all appeals and writs of habeas corpus have been exhausted, attorneys promptly return all copies of the recording.

(B) Notwithstanding subparagraph (A), the children’s advocacy center or other identified multidisciplinary team member custodian shall release or consent to the release or use of any recording, upon request, to both of the following:

(i) Law enforcement agencies authorized to investigate child abuse, or agencies authorized to prosecute juvenile or criminal conduct described in the forensic interview.

(ii) County counsel evaluating an allegation of child abuse.

(C) In any court proceeding, release of any recording pursuant to
 the civil, dependency, or criminal discovery process shall be accompanied by a protective order, unless the court finds good cause that disclosure of the recording should not be subject to such an order.

(D) The child advocacy center where a forensic interview is conducted may use the recording for purposes of supervision and peer review as required to meet national accreditation standards. Recordings that anonymize the child’s face or likeness may be used for training.

(E) (i) Recognizing the inherent privacy interest that a child has with respect to the child’s recorded voice and image when describing highly sensitive details of abuse or neglect, any and all recordings of child forensic interviews shall not be the subject to a Public Records Act (Division
 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code) request and are exempt from any such request.

(ii) The recording shall not become a public record in any legal proceeding.

(iii) The court shall order the recording be sealed and preserved at the conclusion of the criminal proceeding.

(c) This section does not preclude a county from utilizing more than one children’s advocacy center.

(d) The files, reports, records, communications, and working papers used or developed in providing services through a children’s advocacy center are confidential and are not public records.

(e) Notwithstanding any other law providing for the confidentiality of information or records relating to the investigation of suspected child abuse or neglect, the members of a multidisciplinary team associated with a children’s advocacy center, including agency representatives, child forensic interviewers, and other providers at the children’s advocacy center, are authorized to share with other multidisciplinary team members any information or records concerning the child and family and the person who is the subject of the investigation of suspected child abuse or neglect for the sole purpose of facilitating a forensic interview or case discussion or providing services to the child or family, provided, however, that the shared information or records shall be treated as confidential to the extent required by law by the receiving multidisciplinary team members.

(f) An employee or designated agent of a child and family advocacy center that meets the requirements of subdivision (b) is immune from any civil liability that arises from the employee’s or designated agent’s participation in the investigation process and services provided by the child and family advocacy center, unless the employee or designated agent acted with malice or has been charged with or is suspected of abusing or neglecting the child who is the subject of the investigation or services provided. This subdivision does not supersede or limit any other immunity provided by law.

(g) As used in this section “recording” includes audio, video, digital, or any other manner in which the child’s voice or likeness is memorialized.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 717, Sec. 1.   (SB 603)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11166.5.

(a) On and after January 1, 1985, any mandated reporter as specified in Section 11165.7, with the exception of child visitation monitors, prior to commencing his or her employment, and as a prerequisite to that employment, shall sign a statement on a form provided to him or her by his or her employer to the effect that he or she has knowledge of the provisions of Section 11166 and will comply with those provisions. The statement shall inform the employee that he or she is a mandated reporter and inform the employee of his or her reporting obligations under Section 11166 and of his or her confidentiality rights under subdivision (d) of Section 11167. The employer shall provide a copy of Sections 11165.7, 11166, and 11167 to the employee.

On and after January 1, 1993, any person who acts as a child visitation monitor, as defined in paragraph (30) of subdivision (a) of Section 11165.7, prior to engaging in monitoring the first visit in a case, shall sign a statement on a form provided to him or her by the court which ordered the presence of that third person during the visit, to the effect that he or she has knowledge of the provisions of Section 11166 and will comply with those provisions.

The signed statements shall be retained by the employer or the court, as the case may be. The cost of printing, distribution, and filing of these statements shall be borne by the employer or the court.

This subdivision is not applicable to persons employed by public or private youth centers, youth recreation programs, and youth organizations as members of the support staff or maintenance staff and who do not work with, observe, or have knowledge of children as part of their official duties.

(b) On and after January 1, 1986, when a person is issued a state license or certificate to engage in a profession or occupation, the members of which are required to make a report pursuant to Section 11166, the state agency issuing the license or certificate shall send a statement substantially similar to the one contained in subdivision (a) to the person at the same time as it transmits the document indicating licensure or certification to the person. In addition to the requirements contained in subdivision (a), the statement also shall indicate that failure to comply with the requirements of Section 11166 is a misdemeanor, punishable by up to six months in a county jail, by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that imprisonment and fine.

(c) As an alternative to the procedure required by subdivision (b), a state agency may cause the required statement to be printed on all application forms for a license or certificate printed on or after January 1, 1986.

(d) On and after January 1, 1993, any child visitation monitor, as defined in paragraph (30) of subdivision (a) of Section 11165.7, who desires to act in that capacity shall have received training in the duties imposed by this article, including training in child abuse identification and child abuse reporting. The person, prior to engaging in monitoring the first visit in a case, shall sign a statement on a form provided to him or her by the court which ordered the presence of that third person during the visit, to the effect that he or she has received this training. This statement may be included in the statement required by subdivision (a) or it may be a separate statement. This statement shall be filed, along with the statement required by subdivision (a), in the court file of the case for which the visitation monitoring is being provided.

(e) Any person providing services to a minor child, as described in paragraph (37) of subdivision (a) of Section 11165.7, shall not be required to make a report pursuant to Section 11166 unless that person has received training, or instructional materials in the appropriate language, on the duties imposed by this article, including identifying and reporting child abuse and neglect.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 842, Sec. 10.5.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

11167.

(a) Reports of known or reasonably suspected child abuse or neglect pursuant to Section 11166 or Section 11166.05 shall include the name, business address, and telephone number of the mandated reporter; the capacity that makes the person a mandated reporter; and the information that gave rise to the knowledge or reasonable suspicion of child abuse or neglect and the source or sources of that information. If a report is made, the following information, if known, shall also be included in the report: the child’s name, address, present location, and, if applicable, school, grade, and class; the names, addresses, and telephone numbers of the child’s parents or guardians; and the name, address, telephone number, and other relevant personal information
 about the person or persons who the mandated reporter knows or reasonably suspects to have abused or neglected the child. The mandated reporter shall make a report even if some of this information is not known or is uncertain to them.

(b) Information relevant to the incident of child abuse or neglect and information relevant to a report made pursuant to Section 11166.05 may be given to an investigator from an agency that is investigating the known or suspected case of child abuse or neglect.

(c) Information relevant to the incident of child abuse or neglect, including the investigation report and other pertinent materials, and information relevant to a report made pursuant to Section 11166.05 may be given to the licensing agency when it is investigating a known or suspected case of
 child abuse or neglect.

(d) (1) The identity of all persons who report under this article shall be confidential and disclosed only among agencies receiving or investigating mandated reports, to the prosecutor in a criminal prosecution or in an action initiated under Section 602 of the Welfare and Institutions Code arising from alleged child abuse, or to counsel appointed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 317 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or to the county counsel or prosecutor in a proceeding under Part 4 (commencing with Section 7800) of Division 12 of the Family Code or Section 300 of the Welfare and Institutions Code, or to a licensing agency when abuse or neglect in out-of-home care is reasonably suspected, or when those persons waive confidentiality, or by court order.

(2) No agency or person listed in this subdivision shall disclose the identity of any person who reports under this article to that person’s employer, except with the employee’s consent or by court order.

(e) Notwithstanding the confidentiality requirements of this section, a representative of a child protective services agency performing an investigation that results from a report of reasonably suspected child abuse or neglect made pursuant to Section 11166 or Section 11166.05, at the time of the initial contact with the individual who is subject to the investigation, shall advise the individual of the complaints or allegations against them, in a manner that is consistent with laws protecting the identity of the reporter under this article.

(f) (1) An agency specified in Section 11165.9 receiving a report of known or reasonably suspected child abuse or neglect pursuant to subdivision (g) of Section 11166 shall ask the reporter to provide all of the following information in the report:

(A) Their name.

(B) Their telephone number.

(C) The information that gave rise to the knowledge or reasonable suspicion of child
 abuse or neglect.

(D) The source or sources of the information that gave rise to the knowledge or reasonable suspicion of child abuse or neglect.

(2) If the reporter refuses to provide their name or telephone number, the agency shall make efforts to
 determine the basis for that refusal and advise the reporter that the identifying information will remain confidential.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2023, Ch. 434, Sec. 1.   (AB 391)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

11167.5.
